Utah statutes.
78A-6-1113.   Property damage caused by a minor -- Liability of parent or
legal guardian -- Criminal conviction or adjudication for criminal mischief or
criminal trespass not a prerequisite for civil action under chapter -- When
parent or guardian not liable.
(1)  The parent or legal guardian having legal custody of the minor is liable
for damages sustained to property not to exceed $2,000 when:
(a)  the minor intentionally damages, defaces, destroys, or takes the property
of another;
(b)  the minor recklessly or willfully shoots or propels a missile, or other
object at or against a motor vehicle, bus, airplane, boat, locomotive, train,
railway car, or caboose, whether moving or standing; or
(c)  the minor intentionally and unlawfully tampers with the property of
another and thereby recklessly endangers human life or recklessly causes or
threatens a substantial interruption or impairment of any public utility
service.
(2)  The parent or legal guardian having legal custody of the minor is liable
for damages sustained to property not to exceed $5,000 when the minor commits
an offense under Section (1):
(a)  for the benefit of, at the direction of, or in association with any
criminal street gang as defined in Section 76-9-802; or
(b)  to gain recognition, acceptance, membership, or increased status with a
criminal street gang.
(3)  As used in this section, property damage described under Subsection
(1)(a) or (c), or Subsection (2), includes graffiti, as defined in Section
76-6-107.
(4)  A court may waive part or all of the liability for damages under this
section by the parent or legal guardian if the offender is adjudicated in the
juvenile court under Section 78A-6-117 only upon stating on the record that
the court finds:
(a)  good cause; or
(b)  the parent or legal guardian:
(i)  made a reasonable effort to restrain the wrongful conduct; and
(ii)  reported the conduct to the property owner involved or the law
enforcement agency having primary jurisdiction after the parent or guardian
knew of the minor's unlawful act.
(5)  A report is not required under Subsection (4)(b) from a parent or legal
guardian if the minor was arrested or apprehended by a peace officer or by
anyone acting on behalf of the property owner involved.
(6)  A conviction for criminal mischief under Section 76-6-106, criminal
trespass under Section 76-6-206, or an adjudication under Section 78A-6-117 is
not a condition precedent to a civil action authorized under Subsection (1) or
(2).
(7)  A parent or guardian is not liable under Subsection (1) or (2) if the
parent or guardian made a reasonable effort to supervise and direct their
minor child, or, in the event the parent or guardian knew in advance of the
possible taking, injury, or destruction by their minor child, made a
reasonable effort to restrain the child.
